Washington statutes.
RCW 36.54.150

County ferry districts—Budget of fund requirements.

The governing body of the ferry district shall annually prepare a budget of the requirements of each district fund.

[ 2003 c 83 s 305.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Captions, part headings not law—Severability—Effective date—2003 c 83: See notes following RCW 36.57A.200.